Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1405
Qualified program.

The State Treasurer and, to the extent required by the terms of such designation, any designated administrator shall operate the program so that it constitutes a qualified program in compliance with the requirements of section 529A.

Laws 2015, LB591, § 5.